Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202679-228
Schools maintain epinephrine; State Department of Education; authorize.

The State Department of Education may authorize any accredited or approved public, private, denominational, or parochial school to maintain epinephrine in any form approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration for the purpose of emergency first aid to students who experience allergic reactions.

Laws 2026, LB867, § 37.
July 18, 2026